Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
QUALITY OF LIFE MEASURES
SECTION 1.  ORS 414.065 is amended to read:
414.065. (1)(a) [With respect to health care  and services to be provided in medical assistance during
any period, the Oregon Health Authority shall determine, ] Consistent with ORS  414.690, 414.710,
414.712 and  414.766 and other statutes governing the provision of and payments for health
services in medical assistance,  the Oregon Health Authority shall determine,  subject to such
revisions as it may make from time to time and [ subject] to legislative funding  [ and paragraph (b)
of this subsection ]:
(A) The types and  extent of health [ care and ] services to be provided to each eligible group of
recipients of medical assistance.
(B) Standards, including outcome and quality  measures, to be observed in the provision of health
[care and ] services.
(C) The  number of days of health [ care and] services toward the cost of which medical assistance
funds will be expended in the care of any person.
(D) Reasonable  fees, charges, daily rates and global payments for meeting the costs of providing
health services to an applicant or recipient.
(E) Reasonable fees for professional medical  and dental services which may be based on usual
and customary fees in the locality for similar services.
(F) The amount and application of any  copayment or other similar cost-sharing payment that the
authority may require a recipient to pay toward the cost of health [ care or ] services.
(b) The authority shall adopt rules establishing timelines for payment  of health services under
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) In making the determinations under subsection (1) of  this section and in the imposi-
tion of any utilization controls on access to health services, the  authority may not consider
a quality of life in general measure, either directly or by considering a source that relies on
a quality of life in general measure.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1508 (SB 1508-A) Page 1
[(2)] (3) The types and extent of health [ care and] services and the amounts to be paid in meeting
the costs thereof, as determined and fixed  by the authority and within the limits of funds available
therefor, shall be the total available for medical assistance , and payments for such medical assist-
ance shall be the total amounts from medical assistance funds available  to providers of health [ care
and] services in meeting the costs thereof.
[(3)] (4)  Except for payments under a cost-sharing plan, payments made  by the authority for
medical assistance shall constitute payment in full for all health [ care and ] services for  which such
payments of medical assistance were made.
[(4)] (5) Notwithstanding [ subsections (1) and (2) ] subsection (1) of this section, the Department
of Human Services shall be responsible  for determining the payment for Medicaid-funded long term
care services and for contracting with the providers of long term care services.
[(5)] (6) In determining a global budget for a coordinated care organization:
(a) The allocation of the payment, the risk  and any cost savings shall be determined by the
governing body of the organization;
(b) The authority shall consider the community  health assessment conducted by the organization
in accordance with ORS 414.577 and reviewed annually, and the  organization’s health care costs;
and
(c) The authority shall  take into account the organization’s provision of innovative, nontradi-
tional health services.
[(6)] (7)  Under the  supervision of the Governor, the authority may work with the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services to develop, in addition to global budgets, payment streams:
(a) To support improved delivery of health care to recipients of medical assistance; and
(b) That are funded by coordinated care organizations,  counties or other entities other than the
state whose contributions qualify for federal  matching funds under Title XIX or XXI of the Social
Security Act.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 414.689 is amended to read:
414.689. (1) The Health Evidence Review  Commission shall select one of its members as chair-
person and another as vice chairperson, for terms  and with duties and powers the commission de-
termines necessary for the performance of the functions of the offices.
(2) A majority of the members of the commission constitutes  a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(3) The commission shall meet at least four times per year at a place, day  and hour determined
by the chairperson. The commission also  shall meet at other times and places specified by the call
of the chairperson or of a majority  of the members of the commission. All meetings and deliber-
ations of the commission shall be in accordance with ORS 192.610 to 192.690.  The commission
may not meet in executive session to hear evidence from an  advisory committee or sub-
committee or  a panel of experts or to deliberate on matters presented by an advisory com-
mittee or subcommittee or a panel of experts.
(4) The commission may use advisory committees or  subcommittees whose members are ap-
pointed by the chairperson of the commission subject to approval by a majority of the members of
the commission. The advisory committees or subcommittees may contain experts appointed by  the
chairperson and a majority of the members of the commission. The conditions of service of  the ex-
perts will be determined by the chairperson and a majority of the members of the commission.
(5) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff and support services to the commission.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 414.690 is amended to read:
414.690. (1) The Health  Evidence Review Commission shall regularly solicit testimony and in-
formation from stakeholders representing consumers, advocates,  providers, carriers and employers
in conducting the work of the commission.
(2) The commission shall actively solicit public involvement through  a public meeting process
to guide health resource allocation decisions  that includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Providing members of the public  the opportunity to provide input on the selection of
any vendor that provides research and analysis to the commission; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1508 (SB 1508-A) Page 2
(b) Inviting public comment on any  research or analysis tool or health economic meas-
ures to be relied upon by the commission in the commission’s decision-making .
(3)(a) The  commission shall develop and maintain a list of health services ranked by priority,
from the most important to the least important, representing the comparative benefits of  each ser-
vice to the population to be served.
(b) Except as provided in ORS 414.701, the  commission may not rely upon any quality of
life in general measures, either directly or by considering research or  analysis that relies
on a quality of life in general measure, in determining:
(A) Whether a service is cost-effective;
(B) Whether a service is recommended; or
(C) The value of a service.
(c) The list must be submitted by the commission pursuant to subsection (5) of this section  and
is not subject to alteration by any other state agency.
(4) In order to encourage effective and efficient medical evaluation  and treatment, the commis-
sion:
(a) May include clinical practice guidelines in its prioritized list of services. The commission
shall actively solicit testimony and information from the medical community  and the public to build
a consensus on clinical practice guidelines developed by the commission.
(b) May include statements of intent in  its prioritized list of services. Statements of intent
should give direction on coverage decisions where medical codes  and clinical practice guidelines
cannot convey the intent of the commission.
(c) Shall consider both the clinical effectiveness and cost-effectiveness of health services,  in-
cluding drug therapies, in determining their relative importance using peer-reviewed medical  litera-
ture [ as defined in ORS 743A.060 ].
(5) The commission shall report the prioritized list of services to the Oregon Health  Authority
for budget determinations by July 1 of each even-numbered year.
(6) The commission shall make its report during each regular  session of the Legislative Assem-
bly and shall submit a copy of its report to the Governor, the Speaker of the House  of Represen-
tatives and the President of the Senate and post to the Oregon Health Authority’s website,
along with a solicitation of public  comment, an assessment of the impact on access to med-
ically necessary treatment and services  by persons with disabilities or chronic illnesses re-
sulting from the commission’s  prior use of any quality of life in general measures or any
research or analysis that referred to or relied upon a quality of life in general measure .
(7) The commission may alter the list during the interim only as follows:
(a) To make technical changes to correct errors and omissions;
(b) To accommodate changes due to  advancements in medical technology or new data regarding
health outcomes;
(c) To accommodate changes to clinical practice guidelines; and
(d) To add statements of intent that clarify the prioritized list.
(8) If a service is deleted or added  during an interim and no new funding is required, the com-
mission shall report to the Speaker of the House of Representatives and  the President of the Senate.
However, if a service to be added requires increased funding to avoid discontinuing  another service,
the commission shall report to the Emergency Board to request the funding.
(9) The prioritized list of services remains in effect  for a two-year period beginning no earlier
than October 1 of each odd-numbered year.
(10)(a) As  used in this section, “peer-reviewed medical literature” means scientific
studies printed in journals or other publications that publish original  manuscripts only after
the manuscripts have been critically reviewed by unbiased independent experts for scientific
accuracy, validity and reliability.
(b) “Peer-reviewed medical literature” does not include internal publications of pharma-
ceutical manufacturers.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 414.701 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1508 (SB 1508-A) Page 3
414.701. (1) As used in this section, “peer-reviewed medical literature” has the  meaning
given that term in ORS 414.690.
(2) The Health Evidence Review Commission, in ranking health services  or developing guide-
lines under ORS 414.690 or in assessing  medical technologies under ORS 414.698, and the Pharmacy
and Therapeutics Committee, in considering a recommendation for a  drug to be included on any
preferred drug list or on the Practitioner-Managed Prescription Drug Plan[ ,]:
(a) May not rely solely on the results of comparative effectiveness research  but must  evaluate
a range of research and analysis, including peer-reviewed medical literature that:
(A) Studies health  outcomes that are priorities for persons with disabilities who experi-
ence specific diseases or illnesses, through surveys or other methods  of identifying priority
outcomes for individuals who experience the diseases or illnesses;
(B) Studies subgroups of patients who experience  specific diseases or illnesses, to ensure
consideration of  any important differences and clinical characteristics applicable to the sub-
groups; and
(C) Considers the full range of relevant,  peer-reviewed medical literature and avoids
harm to patients caused  by undue emphasis on evidence that is deemed inconclusive of
clinical differences without further investigation .
(b) May consider research or analyses that reference  a quality of life in general measure
only if:
(A) The staff of the commission includes an individual who:
(i) Is trained in identifying bias and discrimination in medical research and analyses;
(ii) Is not involved in research evaluation and recommendations for  a given condition-
treatment pair on the prioritized list subject to the commission’s review; and
(iii) Determines that any of a researcher’s conclusions and  analyses about the value or
cost-effectiveness of a treatment,  that were relied upon by the staff of the commission in
making a recommendation regarding the treatment, did not rely upon and were not influ-
enced by the quality of life in general measure; and
(B) All references  to the quality of life in general measure are redacted from the re-
search or analyses before the research or analyses  are presented to the commission or to
any advisory committee or subcommittees used or consulted by the commission.
(3) The commission may not contract with  a single vendor to provide or compile research
and analysis that is considered by the commission, and  the commission shall publicly dis-
close, regarding vendors providing or compiling research or analysis to the commission:
(a) The vendors’ funding sources; and
(b) Any conflicts of interest that a vendor may have with respect  to the research and
analysis provided.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 414.025 is amended to read:
414.025. As used in this chapter and ORS chapters 411 and  413, unless the context or a specially
applicable statutory definition requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Alternative payment methodology” means a payment other  than a fee-for-services pay-
ment, used by coordinated care organizations as compensation for the provision of integrated and
coordinated health care and services.
(b) “Alternative payment methodology” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Shared savings arrangements;
(B) Bundled payments; and
(C) Payments based on episodes.
(2) “Behavioral health assessment” means an evaluation by  a behavioral health clinician, in
person or using telemedicine, to determine a patient’s need for immediate crisis stabilization.
(3) “Behavioral health clinician” means:
(a) A licensed psychiatrist;
(b) A licensed psychologist;
(c) A licensed nurse practitioner with a specialty in psychiatric mental health;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1508 (SB 1508-A) Page 4
(d) A licensed clinical social worker;
(e) A licensed professional counselor or licensed marriage and family therapist;
(f) A certified clinical social work associate;
(g) An intern or resident who is working under  a board-approved supervisory contract in a
clinical mental health field; or
(h) Any other clinician  whose authorized scope of practice includes mental health diagnosis and
treatment.
(4) “Behavioral health crisis” means a disruption in an  individual’s mental or emotional stability
or functioning resulting in an urgent  need for immediate outpatient treatment in an emergency de-
partment or  admission to a hospital to prevent a serious deterioration in the individual’s mental or
physical health.
(5) “Behavioral health home”  means a mental health disorder or substance use disorder treat-
ment organization, as defined by the Oregon Health  Authority by rule, that provides integrated
health care to individuals  whose primary diagnoses are mental health disorders or substance use
disorders.
(6) “Category  of aid” means assistance provided by the Oregon Supplemental Income Program,
aid granted under ORS 411.877 to  411.896 and 412.001 to 412.069 or federal Supplemental Security
Income payments.
(7) “Community health  worker” means an individual who meets qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in an urban or rural community, either for pay or as a volunteer in  association with
a local health care system;
(c) To the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and  life experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their  health and increases the capacity of the
community to meet the health care needs of its residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services such as first aid or blood pressure screening.
(8) “Coordinated care organization” means an organization meeting criteria adopted by  the
Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.572.
(9) “Dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid” means, with respect to eligibility for  enrollment
in a coordinated care organization, that an individual is eligible for health services funded by Title
XIX of the Social Security Act and is:
(a) Eligible for or enrolled in Part A of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act; or
(b) Enrolled in Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act.
(10)(a) “Family support specialist” means an individual who  meets qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who provides supportive services to and has  experience
parenting a child who:
(A) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(B) Is facing or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health  and wellness services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “family support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
(11) “Global budget” means a total amount established prospectively by  the Oregon Health Au-
thority to be paid to a coordinated care organization for the  delivery of, management of, access to
and quality of the health care delivered to members of the coordinated care organization.
(12) “Health insurance exchange” or “exchange” means an American Health Benefit  Exchange
described in 42 U.S.C. 18031, 18032, 18033 and 18041.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1508 (SB 1508-A) Page 5
(13) “Health services” means at least so much of each of the following as are funded  by the
Legislative Assembly based upon the prioritized list  of health services compiled by the Health Evi-
dence Review Commission under ORS 414.690:
(a) Services required by federal law to be included in the state’s medical assistance program in
order for the program to qualify for federal funds;
(b) Services provided by a physician as defined in ORS 677.010, a nurse  practitioner licensed
under ORS 678.375, a behavioral health  clinician or other licensed practitioner within the scope of
the practitioner’s practice as defined by state law, and ambulance services;
(c) Prescription drugs;
(d) Laboratory and X-ray services;
(e) Medical equipment and supplies;
(f) Mental health services;
(g) Chemical dependency services;
(h) Emergency dental services;
(i) Nonemergency dental services;
(j) Provider services, other than services described in paragraphs (a) to (i), (k), (L) and  (m) of
this subsection, defined by federal  law that may be included in the state’s medical assistance pro-
gram;
(k) Emergency hospital services;
(L) Outpatient hospital services; and
(m) Inpatient hospital services.
(14) “Income” has the meaning given that term in ORS 411.704.
(15)(a) “Integrated health care” means care provided to individuals and their families  in a pa-
tient centered  primary care home or behavioral health home by licensed primary care clinicians,
behavioral health clinicians and other care team members, working together to address one or  more
of the following:
(A) Mental illness.
(B) Substance use disorders.
(C) Health behaviors that contribute to chronic illness.
(D) Life stressors and crises.
(E) Developmental risks and conditions.
(F) Stress-related physical symptoms.
(G) Preventive care.
(H) Ineffective patterns of health care utilization.
(b) As used in this subsection, “other care team members” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Qualified mental health professionals  or qualified mental health associates meeting require-
ments adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule;
(B) Peer wellness specialists;
(C) Peer support specialists;
(D) Community health workers who have completed a state-certified training program;
(E) Personal health navigators; or
(F) Other qualified individuals approved by the Oregon Health Authority.
(16) “Investments and savings” means cash,  securities as defined in ORS 59.015, negotiable in-
struments as defined in ORS 73.0104 and such similar investments or  savings as the department or
the authority may establish by rule that  are available to the applicant or recipient to contribute
toward meeting the needs of the applicant or recipient.
(17) “Medical assistance” means so much of the  medical, mental health, preventive, supportive,
palliative and remedial care and services as may be prescribed by the authority  according to the
standards established pursuant to  ORS 414.065, including premium assistance under ORS 414.115 and
414.117, payments made for services provided under an insurance or other contractual  arrangement
and money paid directly to the recipient for the purchase of health services and for  services de-
scribed in ORS 414.710.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1508 (SB 1508-A) Page 6
(18) “Medical assistance” includes  any care or services for any individual who is a patient in
a medical institution or any care or services for any individual who has attained 65 years of age
or is under 22 years of age, and who is a patient in a private  or public institution for mental dis-
eases. Except as provided in ORS 411.439 and 411.447, “medical assistance” does not  include care
or services for a resident of a nonmedical public institution.
(19) “Patient centered primary care home” means a  health care team or clinic that is organized
in accordance with the standards  established by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.655
and that incorporates the following core attributes:
(a) Access to care;
(b) Accountability to consumers and to the community;
(c) Comprehensive whole person care;
(d) Continuity of care;
(e) Coordination and integration of care; and
(f) Person and family centered care.
(20) “Peer support specialist” means any of the following  individuals who meet qualification
criteria adopted by the authority under ORS  414.665 and who provide supportive services to a cur-
rent or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment:
(a) An individual who is a current or former consumer of mental health treatment; or
(b) An  individual who is in recovery, as defined by the Oregon Health Authority by rule, from
an addiction disorder.
(21) “Peer wellness specialist” means an individual  who meets qualification criteria adopted by
the authority under ORS 414.665 and  who is responsible for assessing mental health and substance
use disorder service and support needs of a member of a coordinated care organization  through
community outreach, assisting members with access to available services and  resources, addressing
barriers to services and providing education and information about available resources for individ-
uals with mental health or substance use disorders in order to reduce stigma  and discrimination
toward consumers  of mental health and substance use disorder services and to assist the member
in creating and maintaining recovery, health and wellness.
(22) “Person centered care” means care that:
(a) Reflects the individual patient’s strengths and preferences;
(b) Reflects the clinical needs of the patient as identified through  an individualized assessment;
and
(c) Is based upon the patient’s goals and will assist the patient in achieving the goals.
(23) “Personal health navigator” means an individual who meets qualification criteria  adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who provides  information, assistance, tools and support to
enable a patient to make  the best health care decisions in the patient’s particular circumstances and
in light of the patient’s needs, lifestyle, combination of conditions and desired outcomes.
(24) “Prepaid managed care health services organization” means a  managed dental care, mental
health or chemical dependency organization that contracts with the authority  under ORS 414.654
or with a coordinated care organization on a prepaid capitated basis to provide health  services to
medical assistance recipients.
(25) “Quality measure” means the health outcome and quality measures and benchmarks identi-
fied by the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee and the  metrics and scoring subcommittee in
accordance with ORS 413.017 (4) and 413.022  and the quality metrics developed by the Behavioral
Health Committee in accordance with ORS 413.017 (5).
(26)(a) “Quality of life in general  measure” means an assessment of the value, effective-
ness or cost-effectiveness of a treatment that gives greater value to a year of  life lived in
perfect health than the value given to a year of life lived in less than perfect health.
(b) “Quality of life in general  measure” does not mean an assessment of the value, ef-
fectiveness or cost-effectiveness of  a treatment during a clinical trial in which a study par-
ticipant is  asked to rate the participant’s physical function, pain, general health, vitality,
social functions or other similar domains.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1508 (SB 1508-A) Page 7
[(26)] (27) “Resources” has the meaning given that term in  ORS 411.704. For eligibility purposes,
“resources” does not include charitable contributions raised by a community to assist with  medical
expenses.
[(27)] (28) “Social determinants of health” means:
(a) Nonmedical factors that influence health outcomes;
(b) The conditions in which individuals are born, grow, work, live and age; and
(c) The forces and  systems that shape the conditions of daily life, such as economic policies and
systems, development agendas,  social norms, social policies, racism, climate change and political
systems.
[(28)] (29)  “Tribal traditional health worker” means an individual who meets qualification  cri-
teria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in a tribal community or an urban Indian community, either for pay or as a  volunteer
in association with a local health care system;
(c) To the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and  life experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health, including  physical, behavioral
and oral health, and increases  the capacity of the community to meet the health care needs of its
residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services, such as tribal-based practices.
[(29)(a)] (30)(a) “Youth support specialist” means an individual who meets qualification criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who, based  on a similar life experience, provides
supportive services to an individual who:
(A) Is not older than 30 years of age; and
(B)(i) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(ii) Is facing or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health and wellness  services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “youth support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 414.025, as amended by section 2, chapter 628, Oregon Laws  2021, is amended
to read:
414.025. As used in this chapter and ORS chapters 411 and  413, unless the context or a specially
applicable statutory definition requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Alternative payment methodology” means a payment other  than a fee-for-services pay-
ment, used by coordinated care organizations as compensation for the provision of integrated and
coordinated health care and services.
(b) “Alternative payment methodology” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Shared savings arrangements;
(B) Bundled payments; and
(C) Payments based on episodes.
(2) “Behavioral health assessment” means an evaluation by  a behavioral health clinician, in
person or using telemedicine, to determine a patient’s need for immediate crisis stabilization.
(3) “Behavioral health clinician” means:
(a) A licensed psychiatrist;
(b) A licensed psychologist;
(c) A licensed nurse practitioner with a specialty in psychiatric mental health;
(d) A licensed clinical social worker;
(e) A licensed professional counselor or licensed marriage and family therapist;
(f) A certified clinical social work associate;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1508 (SB 1508-A) Page 8
(g) An intern or resident who is working under  a board-approved supervisory contract in a
clinical mental health field; or
(h) Any other clinician  whose authorized scope of practice includes mental health diagnosis and
treatment.
(4) “Behavioral health crisis” means a disruption in an  individual’s mental or emotional stability
or functioning resulting in an urgent need for immediate outpatient  treatment in an emergency de-
partment or admission to a hospital to prevent a serious deterioration in the individual’s mental  or
physical  health.
(5) “Behavioral health home” means a mental health disorder or substance  use disorder treat-
ment organization, as defined by the Oregon  Health Authority by rule, that provides integrated
health care to individuals whose primary diagnoses are mental health disorders  or substance use
disorders.
(6) “Category of aid” means assistance provided by the Oregon Supplemental Income  Program,
aid granted under ORS 411.877 to 411.896 and 412.001 to  412.069 or federal Supplemental Security
Income payments.
(7) “Community health worker” means an individual who meets qualification  criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in  an urban or rural community, either for pay or as a volunteer in association with
a local health care system;
(c) To the  extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and life experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their  health and increases the capacity of the
community to meet the health care needs of its residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services such as first aid or blood pressure screening.
(8) “Coordinated  care organization” means an organization meeting criteria adopted by the
Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.572.
(9) “Dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid” means, with respect to eligibility for  enrollment
in a coordinated care organization, that an individual is eligible for health services funded by Title
XIX of the Social Security Act and is:
(a) Eligible for or enrolled in Part A of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act; or
(b) Enrolled in Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act.
(10)(a) “Family support specialist” means an individual who  meets qualification criteria adopted
by the  authority under ORS 414.665 and who provides supportive services to and has experience
parenting a child who:
(A) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(B) Is facing or has  faced difficulties in accessing education, health and wellness services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “family support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
(11) “Global budget” means a  total amount established prospectively by the Oregon Health Au-
thority to be paid to a coordinated  care organization for the delivery of, management of, access to
and quality of the health care delivered to members of the coordinated care organization.
(12) “Health  insurance exchange” or “exchange” means an American Health Benefit Exchange
described in 42 U.S.C. 18031, 18032, 18033 and 18041.
(13) “Health services”  means at least so much of each of the following as are funded by the
Legislative Assembly based upon the prioritized list of health  services compiled by the Health Evi-
dence Review Commission under ORS 414.690:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1508 (SB 1508-A) Page 9
(a) Services required by federal law to be included in the state’s medical assistance program in
order for the program to qualify for federal funds;
(b) Services provided by a physician as defined in ORS 677.010, a nurse  practitioner licensed
under ORS 678.375, a behavioral health  clinician or other licensed practitioner within the scope of
the practitioner’s practice as defined by state law, and ambulance services;
(c) Prescription drugs;
(d) Laboratory and X-ray services;
(e) Medical equipment and supplies;
(f) Mental health services;
(g) Chemical dependency services;
(h) Emergency dental services;
(i) Nonemergency dental services;
(j) Provider services, other than services described in paragraphs (a) to (i), (k), (L) and  (m) of
this subsection, defined by federal  law that may be included in the state’s medical assistance pro-
gram;
(k) Emergency hospital services;
(L) Outpatient hospital services; and
(m) Inpatient hospital services.
(14) “Income” has the meaning given that term in ORS 411.704.
(15)(a) “Integrated health care” means care provided to individuals and their families  in a pa-
tient centered  primary care home or behavioral health home by licensed primary care clinicians,
behavioral health clinicians and other care team members, working together to address one or  more
of the following:
(A) Mental illness.
(B) Substance use disorders.
(C) Health behaviors that contribute to chronic illness.
(D) Life stressors and crises.
(E) Developmental risks and conditions.
(F) Stress-related physical symptoms.
(G) Preventive care.
(H) Ineffective patterns of health care utilization.
(b) As used in this subsection, “other care team members” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Qualified mental health professionals  or qualified mental health associates meeting require-
ments adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule;
(B) Peer wellness specialists;
(C) Peer support specialists;
(D) Community health workers who have completed a state-certified training program;
(E) Personal health navigators; or
(F) Other qualified individuals approved by the Oregon Health Authority.
(16) “Investments and savings” means cash,  securities as defined in ORS 59.015, negotiable in-
struments as defined in ORS 73.0104 and such similar investments or  savings as the department or
the authority may establish by rule that  are available to the applicant or recipient to contribute
toward meeting the needs of the applicant or recipient.
(17) “Medical assistance” means so much of the  medical, mental health, preventive, supportive,
palliative and remedial care and services as may be prescribed by the authority  according to the
standards established pursuant to  ORS 414.065, including premium assistance under ORS 414.115 and
414.117, payments made for services provided under an insurance or other contractual  arrangement
and money paid directly to the recipient for the purchase of health services and for  services de-
scribed in ORS 414.710.
(18) “Medical assistance” includes  any care or services for any individual who is a patient in
a medical institution or any care or services for any individual who has attained 65 years of age
or is under 22 years of age, and who is a patient in a private  or public institution for mental dis-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1508 (SB 1508-A) Page 10
eases. Except as provided in ORS 411.439 and 411.447, “medical assistance” does not  include care
or services for a resident of a nonmedical public institution.
(19) “Mental health drug” means  a type of legend drug, as defined in ORS 414.325, specified by
the Oregon Health Authority by rule, including but not limited to:
(a) Therapeutic class 7 ataractics-tranquilizers; and
(b) Therapeutic class 11 psychostimulants-antidepressants.
(20) “Patient centered primary care home” means a  health care team or clinic that is organized
in accordance with the standards established by the Oregon Health  Authority under ORS 414.655
and that incorporates the following core attributes:
(a) Access to care;
(b) Accountability to consumers and to the community;
(c) Comprehensive whole person care;
(d) Continuity of care;
(e) Coordination and integration of care; and
(f) Person and family centered care.
(21) “Peer support specialist” means  any of the following individuals who meet qualification
criteria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who  provide supportive services to a cur-
rent or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment:
(a) An individual who is a current or former consumer of mental health treatment; or
(b) An individual who is in recovery, as defined by the Oregon Health Authority by rule,  from
an addiction disorder.
(22) “Peer wellness specialist” means an individual  who meets qualification criteria adopted by
the authority under ORS 414.665 and who is responsible for  assessing mental health and substance
use disorder  service and support needs of a member of a coordinated care organization through
community outreach, assisting  members with access to available services and resources, addressing
barriers to services and providing education and information about available resources for individ-
uals with mental  health or substance use disorders in order to reduce stigma and discrimination
toward consumers of mental health and substance use disorder services and to assist the  member
in creating and maintaining recovery, health and wellness.
(23) “Person centered care” means care that:
(a) Reflects the individual patient’s strengths and preferences;
(b) Reflects the clinical  needs of the patient as identified through an individualized assessment;
and
(c) Is based upon the patient’s goals and will assist the patient in achieving the goals.
(24) “Personal  health navigator” means an individual who meets qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and  who provides information, assistance, tools and support to
enable a patient to make  the best health care decisions in the patient’s particular circumstances and
in light of the patient’s needs, lifestyle, combination of conditions and desired outcomes.
(25) “Prepaid managed care health services organization” means a  managed dental care, mental
health or chemical dependency  organization that contracts with the authority under ORS 414.654
or with a  coordinated care organization on a prepaid capitated basis to provide health services to
medical assistance recipients.
(26) “Quality measure” means the health outcome and quality measures and benchmarks identi-
fied by the Health Plan Quality  Metrics Committee and the metrics and scoring subcommittee in
accordance with ORS 413.017 (4) and 413.022 and the  quality metrics developed by the Behavioral
Health Committee in accordance with ORS 413.017 (5).
(27)(a) “Quality of life in general measure” means an  assessment of the value, effective-
ness or cost-effectiveness of  a treatment that gives greater value to a year of life lived in
perfect health than the value given to a year of life lived in less than perfect health.
(b) “Quality of life in general measure” does not mean an  assessment of the value, ef-
fectiveness or cost-effectiveness of a treatment during a clinical trial in which  a study par-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1508 (SB 1508-A) Page 11
ticipant is asked to rate the participant’s physical function, pain, general health,  vitality,
social functions or other similar domains.
[(27)] (28) “Resources” has the meaning given that term in  ORS 411.704. For eligibility purposes,
“resources”  does  not include charitable contributions raised by a community to assist with medical
expenses.
[(28)] (29) “Social determinants of health” means:
(a) Nonmedical factors that influence health outcomes;
(b) The conditions in which individuals are born, grow, work, live and age; and
(c) The forces and  systems that shape the conditions of daily life, such as economic policies and
systems, development agendas, social norms, social policies, racism, climate change  and political
systems.
[(29)] (30)  “Tribal traditional health worker” means an individual who meets qualification cri-
teria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in a tribal community or an urban Indian community, either for pay or as a  volunteer
in association with a local health care system;
(c) To the  extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and life experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members  of the community to improve their health, including physical, behavioral
and oral health, and increases the capacity of the community to meet the health  care needs of its
residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services, such as tribal-based practices.
[(30)(a)] (31)(a) “Youth support specialist” means an individual who meets qualification  criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665  and who, based on a similar life experience, provides
supportive services to an individual who:
(A) Is not older than 30 years of age; and
(B)(i) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(ii) Is facing  or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health and wellness services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “youth support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
HEALTH INSURANCE COVERAGE OF INSULIN
SECTION 7.
 ORS 743A.069 is amended to read:
743A.069. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(b) “Insulin” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.696.
(2) A health benefit plan offered in this state may not require an enrollee in the plan  to incur
cost-sharing or other out-of-pocket  costs[ , as adjusted under subsection (3) of this section, ] that exceed
[$75] $35  for each 30-day supply of a type of insulin prescribed  for the treatment of diabetes or
[$225] $105 for each 90-day supply.
[(3) The Department of Consumer and Business Services  shall, by rule, annually adjust the maxi-
mum cost specified in subsection (2) of this section by the percentage  increase, if any, in the cost of
living for the previous calendar year, based on changes in the Consumer Price Index for  All Urban
Consumers, West Region (All Items), as  published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United
States Department of Labor. ]
[(4)] (3) The coverage under this section may not be subject to a deductible imposed by a  health
benefit plan.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1508 (SB 1508-A) Page 12
[(5)] (4)  This section does not prohibit a  health benefit plan from using a drug formulary or
other utilization review protocol applicable to prescription drug coverage under the plan.
[(6)] (5) This section is not subject to ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 8. The amendments to ORS 743A.069 by  section 7 of this 2024 Act apply to
health benefit plans issued, renewed or extended on or after the effective date of this 2024
Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 9.
The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the  reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
Passed by Senate February 13, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House February 27, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1508 (SB 1508-A) Page 13